Wyoming, session 2025, HB0003.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-3-1002 by creating a new subsection
(b), 6-3-1004(a) and by creating a new subsection (c),
HB0003

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0140
6-3-1010 by creating a new subsection (b) and
23-6-206(a)(intro) and (iii) are amended to read:

6-3-1002. Cruelty to animals.

(b) Any person who intentionally injures or disables
a predatory animal as defined by W.S. 23-1-101(a)(viii) by
use of an automotive vehicle, motor-propelled wheeled
vehicle, or vehicle designed for travel over snow shall
upon inflicting the injury or disability immediately use
all reasonable efforts to kill the injured or disabled
predatory animal. Any person who fails to immediately use
all reasonable efforts to kill an injured or disabled
predatory animal as required by this subsection commits
cruelty to animals.

6-3-1004. Penalties; misdemeanor offenses.

(a) A first offense of cruelty to animals or of a
violation of W.S. 6-3-1003 is a misdemeanor punishable by
imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of
not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) one
thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.
HB0003

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0140

(c) In addition to any penalty provided by this
section, for a conviction of a violation of W.S.
6-3-1002(b), a court may revoke any license, suspend a
person's privilege to purchase or receive any other license
or to take any wildlife pursuant to W.S. 23-6-206.

6-3-1010. Impounding and forfeiture hearing;
enforcement.

(b) In addition to any other peace officer with
authority to enforce this article, game and fish law
enforcement personnel qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701
through 9-1-707 are authorized to enforce the provisions of
W.S. 6-3-1002(b) and 6-3-1004.

23-6-206. Revocation of license; hunting after
suspended license.

(a) The court may, in its discretion, revoke any
license issued under this act to any person convicted of a
violation of this act or W.S. 6-3-1002(b), for the
remainder of the year in which the conviction occurs, and
HB0003

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0140
may suspend the person's privilege to purchase or receive
any other license under this act, or to take any wildlife
for the following time periods provided in paragraphs (i)
through (iii) and shall suspend the person's privilege to
purchase or receive any other license under this act for
the time period provided in paragraph (iv) of this
subsection:

(iii) Up to three (3) years for conviction of a
low misdemeanor as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v) or for a
conviction of cruelty to animals pursuant to W.S.
6-3-1002(b);

Section 2. This act shall apply to any person who
intentionally injures or disables a predatory animal by use
of an automotive vehicle, motor-propelled wheeled vehicle,
or vehicle designed for travel over snow on and after July
1, 2025.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0003